New York, session 2025-2026, S10533.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 169 of the executive law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 3 (c) Notwithstanding any other provision, no salary increase for a 4 state officer indicated under subdivision one of this section shall 5 result in a salary above the governor's salary. 6 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 169 of the executive law, as added by 7 chapter 263 of the laws of 1987, is amended to read as follows: 8 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other 9 provision of law, the boards of trustees of the state university of New 10 York and the city university of New York shall each establish and imple- 11 ment salary plans for the chancellors, presidents and senior staffs of 12 such state and city universities, respectively. The board of regents 13 shall establish and implement a separate salary plan for the president 14 of the university of the state of New York, setting forth the compen- 15 sation to be received by the president for performing the duties of that 16 office assigned by the rules of the regents or statute, which shall be 17 in addition to the compensation received by such person pursuant to the 18 provisions of subdivisions one and two of this section. Such salary 19 plans shall be developed after consultation with the governor's office 20 of employee relations and the division of the budget. No salary increase 21 for a chancellor and/or president of the state university of New York or 22 city university of New York shall result in a salary above the gover- 23 nor's salary. Any increase in compensation for the positions set forth 24 in this subdivision, not otherwise funded from any appropriation, shall 25 be funded from reallocations of funds within the appropriations specif- 26 ically identified by the aforementioned boards. Each board of trustees 27 and the board of regents shall file a proposed salary plan report with 28 the chairs of the senate finance committee and the assembly ways and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15878-01-6 S. 10533 2 1 means committee and the director of the budget at least sixty days prior 2 to the effective date of such salary plan. Each salary plan report shall 3 set forth the salary schedule, the dollar value of additional public 4 compensation and other employment benefits that such positions would 5 receive, the specific sources of funding to be reallocated for salary 6 increases, the amount of increase to be provided to each position, the 7 comparison salary data on which the plan is based, and such other infor- 8 mation as the boards of trustees and the board of regents deem appropri- 9 ate. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect April 1, 2027.